Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5419.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 61
SAFEGUARDING AMERICAN VETERAN EMPOWERMENT ACT ("SAVE ACT")
6-61-1. Definitions.
For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Compensation" means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred on,
or received by, any person in return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by that person or
another.
(2) "Veterans' benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of any
claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed an intent to file a claim for any benefit,
program, service, commodity, function, status, or entitlement for which veterans, their dependents,
their survivors, or any other individual are eligible under the laws and regulations administered by
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Rhode Island office of veterans services.
(3) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, trust, partnership, incorporated or
unincorporated association, or any other legal entity.
6-61-2. Representation and assistance rendered to veterans -- Fees.
(a) No person shall receive compensation for referring any individual to another person to

advise or assist the individual with any veterans' benefits matter.
(b) No person shall receive any compensation for any services rendered in connection with
any claim filed within the one year presumptive period of active-duty release, unless the veteran
acknowledges by signing a waiver that they are within this period and choosing to deny free
services available to them.
(c) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting, or consulting with
any individual in connection with any veterans' benefits matter shall, before rendering any services,
memorialize the specific terms under which the amount to be paid will be determined in a written
agreement signed by both parties. Compensation shall be purely contingent upon an increase in
benefits awarded, and if successful, compensation shall not exceed five (5) times the amount of the
monthly increase in benefits awarded based on the claim. No initial or non-refundable fee may be
charged by a person advising, assisting, or consulting an individual on a veteran's benefit matter.
(d) No person shall guarantee, whether directly or by implication, a successful outcome or
that any individual is certain to receive specific veterans' benefits or that any individual is certain
to receive a specific level, percentage, or amount of veterans' benefit.
6-61-3. Disclosure required.
(a) Any person advising, assisting, or consulting on veterans' benefits matters for
compensation shall provide the following disclosure at the outset of the business relationship:
"This business is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs or the Rhode Island office of veterans services, or any other federally chartered
veterans' service organization, and other federally chartered veterans' service organizations may be
able to provide you with this service free of charge. Products or services offered by this business
are not necessarily endorsed by any of these organizations. You may qualify for other veterans'
benefits beyond the benefits for which you are receiving services here."
(b) The written disclosure shall appear in at least twelve (12) point font in an easily
identifiable place in the person's agreement with the individual seeking services. The individual
shall sign the document in which the written disclosure appears to represent understanding of these
provisions. The person offering services shall retain a copy of the written disclosure while
providing veterans' benefits services for compensation to the individual and for at least one year
after the date on which the service relations terminate.
6-61-4. Prohibited activities.
Businesses advising, assisting, or consulting on veterans' benefits matters for a fee shall
abide by the following:
(1) Shall not utilize international call centers or data centers for processing a veteran's
LC001310 - Page 2 of 4

personal information;
(2) Shall not use a veteran's personal log-in, username, or password information to access
that veteran's medical, financial, or government benefits information; and
(3) Shall ensure that any individual who has access to veterans' medical or financial
information undergoes a background check prior to having access to that information. The
background check shall be conducted by a reputable source, include identity verification and a
criminal records check.
6-61-5. Penalties.
(a) A violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute an unfair, false, misleading,
or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 13.1 of title 6.
(b) Civil penalties shall be in an amount ordered by the superior court in an action brought
by the Rhode Island attorney general's office.
(c) Every day a violation continues shall be considered a separate violation.
(d) Any civil penalty collected shall be deposited in the Rhode Island military family relief
fund.
6-61-6. Applicability.
Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or expanding the requirements
imposed on agents, attorneys, or other representatives accredited and regulated by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001310
========
LC001310 - Page 3 of 4